Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1507.01
Failure to give notice; effect.

Any person otherwise having a right to appeal may petition the Tax Equalization and Review Commission in accordance with section 77-5013, on or before December 31 of each year, to determine the actual value or special value of real property for that year if a failure to give notice prevented timely filing of a protest or appeal provided for in sections 77-1501 to 77-1510.

Laws 2005, LB 15, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB167, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB166, § 16.
February 27, 2009